Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 15. Consumer Finance Companies.

Law Review.

For survey of the Virginia law on contracts and sales for the year 1967-1968, see 54 Va. L. Rev. 1572 (1968).

For article on model abusive debt collection statute for Virginia, see 15 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 567 (1974).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1976-1977, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1377 (1977).

For article on regulation of consumer credit in Virginia, see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 91 (1979).

For article, “Revamping Consumer-Credit Contract Law,” see 68 Va. L. Rev. 1333 (1982).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 99; 15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 10.

§ 6.2-1500.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Access partner”
means a person that, at the person’s physical location in the Commonwealth, facilitates the making and servicing of a loan through provision of some or all of the services described in §

6.2-1523.1

pursuant to a contract with a licensee. The term does not include (i) a person licensed under Chapter 25.1 (§ 59.1-335.1 et seq.) of Title 59.1; (ii) a person that is ineligible for licensure under §

6.2-1502

or to which this chapter shall not apply under §

6.2-1503

; (iii) a person that has had any license revoked by the Commission at any time in the previous three years; (iv) a person that has violated or participated in the violation of §

6.2-1501

in the previous five years; or (v) a person who is licensed under Chapter 18 (§

6.2-1800

et seq.) or Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.).

“Arranging or brokering”
means, with respect to consumer finance loans, negotiating, placing, or finding consumer finance loans for consumers, or offering to negotiate, place, or find consumer finance loans for consumers, in return for compensation paid directly by the consumers.

“Consumer finance company”
means a person engaged in the business of making loans to individuals for personal, family, household, or other nonbusiness purposes.

“Licensee”
means a consumer finance company to which a license has been issued by the Commission pursuant to this chapter.

“Principal”
means any person who, directly or indirectly, owns or controls (i) 10 percent or more of the outstanding stock of a stock corporation or (ii) a 10 percent or greater interest in another person.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-275; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-245; 1978, c. 14; 2005, c. 63; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 3 provides: “That any person not licensed under Chapter 15 (§

6.2-1500

et seq.), Chapter 18 (§

6.2-1800

et seq.), or Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia who will be required to be licensed when the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act become effective shall apply for a license on or before October 1, 2020. Any license issued by the State Corporation Commission to any such person prior to January 1, 2021, shall become effective January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 4 provides: “That every person licensed under Chapter 15 (§

6.2-1500

et seq.) of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia shall, on or before January 1, 2021, file a surety bond with the Commissioner of Financial Institutions that meets the requirements of §

6.2-1523.3

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and inserted the definitions for “Access partner” and “Arranging or brokering”; deleted the definition for “License,” which read: “ ‘License’ means a single license issued under this chapter with respect to a single place of business”; and in the definition for “Licensee,” substituted “a license has been issued by the Commission pursuant to this chapter” for “one or more licenses have been issued.”

§ 6.2-1501.
Compliance with chapter; license required; attempts to evade application of chapter.

No person shall engage in the business of making loans to individuals for personal, family, household, or other nonbusiness purposes, and charge, contract for, or receive, directly or indirectly, on or in connection with any loan interest, charges, compensation, consideration, or expense that in the aggregate is greater than the interest permitted by §

6.2-303

, whether or not the person has a location in the Commonwealth, except as provided in and authorized by this chapter, Chapter 18 (§

6.2-1800

et seq.), or Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) and without first having obtained a license from the Commission.

Subject to subdivision C 3 and subsection C of §

6.2-1524

, the prohibition in subsection A shall not be construed to prevent any person, other than a licensee, from:

Providing the services of an access partner described in §

6.2-1523.1

;

Making a mortgage loan pursuant to §§

6.2-325

and

6.2-326

or §§

6.2-327

and

6.2-328

in any principal amount; or

Extending credit as described in §

6.2-312

in any amount.

The provisions of subsection A shall apply to any person who seeks to evade its application by any device, subterfuge, or pretense whatsoever, including:

The loan, forbearance, use, or sale of (i) credit, as guarantor, surety, endorser, comaker, or otherwise; (ii) money; (iii) goods; or (iv) things in action;

The use of collateral or related sales or purchases of goods or services, or agreements to sell or purchase, whether real or pretended; receiving or charging compensation for goods or services, whether or not sold, delivered, or provided; and

The real or pretended negotiation, arrangement, or procurement of a loan through any use or activity of a third person, whether real or fictitious.

No person shall engage in the business of arranging or brokering consumer finance loans for any consumer residing in the Commonwealth, whether or not the person has an office or conducts business at a location in the Commonwealth.

The provisions of this section shall apply to any person, whether or not the person has an office or conducts business at a location in the Commonwealth.

Any loan made in violation of this section is void, and no person shall have the right to collect, receive, or retain any principal, interest, fees, or other charges in connection with the loan.

History.

Code 1950, §§
6-279, 6-281; 1956, c. 71; 1966, c. 584, §§ 6.1-249, 6.1-251; 1968, c. 489; 1974, c. 371; 1986, c. 502; 1995, c. 2; 1998, c. 9; 2001, c. 308; 2002, c. 897; 2010, cc. 477, 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 477, effective October 1, 2010, amended former § 6.1-249, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2010 amendment by c. 477 has been given effect in this section as set out above, by inserting “or Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.)”
in subsection A.

Acts 2010, c. 477, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2010.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and in subsection A, inserted “whether or not the person has a location in the Commonwealth” and “Chapter 18 (§

6.2-1800

et seq.)”; in subdivision B 1, substituted “Providing the services of an access partner described in §

6.2-1523.1

” for “Making a loan in accordance with Chapter 18 (§

6.2-1800

et seq.)”; and added subsections D through F.

§ 6.2-1502.
Certain persons ineligible as licensees; exception for subsidiaries.

No person doing business under the authority of any law of the Commonwealth or of the United States relating to banks, savings institutions, trust companies, building and loan associations, industrial loan associations, or credit unions shall be eligible for licensure under this chapter.

Nothing contained in subsection A or any other section of this title shall be construed to prevent a subsidiary of a bank or savings institution from becoming a licensee under this chapter. A licensee that is a subsidiary or affiliate of a bank or savings institution shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter, and all regulations adopted hereunder, as fully as if such licensee were not such a subsidiary or affiliate.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-280; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-250; 1996, c. 16; 2000, c. 192; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1503.
Scope of chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to:

Any business transacted by any person under the authority of and as permitted by any law of the Commonwealth or of the United States relating to banks, savings institutions, trust companies, building and loan associations, industrial loan associations, or credit unions;

Any bona fide pawnbroking business transacted under a pawnbroker’s license; or

Any person operating in accordance with the specific provisions of any other provision of this title currently in effect or hereafter enacted.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-280; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-250; 1996, c. 16; 2000, c. 192; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1504.
Restrictions on name.

No licensee shall use a firm, corporate, or assumed name that contains any of the words “savings,” “trust,” “trustee,” “bank,” “banker,” “banking,” “investment,” “thrift,” “building,” or “industrial.”

History.

Code 1950, § 6-283; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-253; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1505.
Application for license; application fee.

Application for a license to make loans under this chapter shall be in writing, under oath, and in the form prescribed by the Commission.

The application shall contain:

The name and address of the applicant;

If the applicant is a partnership or association, the name and address of each partner or member of the partnership or association;

If the applicant is a corporation or limited liability company, the name and address of each senior officer, director, member, registered agent, and principal;

If the applicant is a business trust, the name and address of each trustee and beneficiary;

The addresses of the locations where the business is to be conducted; and

Such other information as may be required by the Commission.

The application shall be accompanied by payment of an application fee of $500.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-284; 1966, c. 584, §
6.1-254; 1976, c. 658; 1981, c. 452; 1989, c. 239; 2005, c. 63; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and substituted “addresses of the locations” for “address, with street and number, if any” in subdivision B 5.

§ 6.2-1506.
Investigation of application.

Upon the filing of the application and the payment of the application fee, the Commission shall make such investigation relative to the application and the requirements provided for in §

6.2-1507

as it deems appropriate.

The Commission shall grant or deny each application for a license within 60 days from the date the application, together with all required information and the application fee, is filed unless the period is extended by order of the Commission that recites the reasons for the extension.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-285; 1956, c. 71; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-255; 1989, c. 239; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1507.
Issuance of license.

The Commission shall issue to the applicant a license to make loans in accordance with the provisions of this chapter if it finds:

That the financial responsibility, experience, character and general fitness of the applicant and its members, senior officers, directors, and principals are such as to command the confidence of the public and to warrant belief that this business will be operated lawfully, honestly, fairly and efficiently within the purpose of this chapter;

That the applicant has available, for the operation of the business, unencumbered liquid assets of at least $25,000 per location;

That the applicant has complied with all of the prerequisites to obtaining the license prescribed by §

6.2-1505

; and

That the applicant will not make loans in accordance with the provisions of this chapter at the same location at which the applicant, its affiliate, or its subsidiary conducts business under either Chapter 18 (§

6.2-1800

et seq.) or Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.).If the Commission fails to make the findings required by subdivisions 1, 2, 3, and 4, it shall deny the application for a license.

If the Commission denies an application for a license, it shall notify the applicant of the denial. The Commission shall retain the application fee.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-287; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-257; 1982, c. 79, § 6.1-256.1; 1995, c. 2; 2005, c. 63; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and in subsection A in the introductory language, deleted “and deliver” following “shall issue” and deleted “at the location in the Commonwealth specified in the application” following “this chapter”; in subdivision A 2, substituted “unencumbered liquid assets of at least $25,000 per location” for “at the specified location, liquid assets of at least $50,000 if the specified location is in a locality with a population of more than 20,000, or of at least $25,000 if the location is not in a locality with a population of more than 20,000”; added subdivision A 4; in the final paragraph of subsection A, inserted “and 4”; deleted former subsection B, pertaining to applicants with an existing license at another location; and redesignated former subsection C as subsection B.

§ 6.2-1508.
Notices to Commission.

After receiving approval to conduct business at an additional location pursuant to subsection B of §

6.2-1507

or providing notice of relocation pursuant to §

6.2-1519

, a licensee shall give written notice to the Commissioner within 10 days of the commencement of business at the additional location or relocated place of business.

Every licensee shall notify the Commissioner, in writing, within 10 days of (i) the closing of any business location, and (ii) the name, address and position of each new senior officer, member, partner, or director. The licensee also shall provide such other information with respect to any such event as the Commissioner may reasonably require.

History.

1982, c. 79, § 6.1-256.1; 1995, c. 2; 2005, c. 63; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1508.1.
Additional offices; relocation of offices.

No licensee shall open an additional office without prior approval of the Commission. Applications for such approval shall be made in writing on a form prescribed by the Commissioner and shall be accompanied by payment of a $150 nonrefundable application fee. The application shall be approved unless the Commission finds that the applicant does not have the required liquid assets or surety bond or has not conducted business under this chapter efficiently, fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with the law. The application shall be deemed approved if notice to the contrary has not been sent by the Commission to the applicant within 30 days of the date the application is received by the Commission.

Prior approval of the Commission shall not be required in the event that a licensee needs to temporarily open an office due to a natural disaster or act of God. However, the licensee shall notify the Commission within 10 days of opening the office.

A licensee shall notify the Commission in writing within 10 days of relocating any approved office.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-1509.
Contents, posting, transfer, and duration of license.

Each license shall contain:

The address at which the business is to be conducted;

The full name of the licensee or, if the licensee is a partnership or association, the names of the partners or members; and

If the licensee is a corporation, the date and place of incorporation.

The licensee shall post the license prominently in each approved place of business of the licensee. The licensee shall prominently disclose on its website the license number assigned by the Commission to the licensee.

The license shall not be transferable or assignable.

Each license shall remain in full force and effect until surrendered, revoked, or suspended as provided by this chapter or by lawful order of the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-288, 6-289; 1966, c. 584, §§ 6.1-258, 6.1-259; 1980, c. 211; 1982, c. 609; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Cross references.

As to fees for license, examination, supervision and regulation, see §

6.2-1532

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and in subsection B, substituted “post the license prominently in each approved place of business of the licensee” for “keep the license conspicuously posted in its place of business” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

§ 6.2-1510.
Acquisition of control; application.

Except as provided in this section, no person shall acquire, directly or indirectly, 25 percent or more of the voting shares of a corporation, or 25 percent or more of the ownership of any other person, licensed to conduct business under this chapter unless such person first:

Files an application with the Commission in such form as the Commissioner may prescribe from time to time;

Delivers such other information to the Commissioner as the Commissioner may require concerning the financial responsibility, background, experience, and activities of the applicant, its directors, senior officers, principals, and members, and of any proposed new directors, senior officers, principals, or members of the licensee; and

Pays such application fee as the Commission may prescribe.

Upon the filing and investigation of an application, the Commission shall permit the applicant to acquire the interest in the licensee if it finds that the applicant, its members if applicable, its directors, senior officers, and principals, and any proposed new directors, members, senior officers, and principals have the financial responsibility, character, reputation, experience, and general fitness to warrant belief that the business will be operated efficiently and fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with law. The Commission shall grant or deny the application within 60 days from the date a completed application accompanied by the required fee is filed unless the period is extended by order of the Commissioner reciting the reasons for the extension. If the application is denied, the Commission shall notify the applicant of the denial and the reasons for the denial.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to (i) the acquisition of an interest in a licensee, directly or indirectly, including an acquisition by merger or consolidation, by or with a person licensed by this chapter, (ii) the acquisition of an interest in a licensee, directly or indirectly, including an acquisition by merger or consolidation, by or with a person affiliated through common ownership with the licensee, or (iii) the acquisition of an interest in a licensee by a person by bequest, descent, survivorship or operation of law. The person acquiring an interest in a licensee in a transaction that is exempt from filing an application by this subsection shall send written notice to the Commissioner of such acquisition within 30 days of its closing.

History.

2005, c. 63, § 6.1-258.1; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1511.
Revocation of license.

The Commission, upon 10 days’ written notice to the licensee stating the contemplated action and in general the grounds therefor, and upon reasonable opportunity to be heard, may revoke any license issued hereunder if it finds that:

The licensee has failed to pay the annual fee assessed pursuant to §

6.2-1532

or to comply with any order of the Commission lawfully made pursuant to and within the authority of this chapter;

The licensee, either knowingly or without the exercise of due care to prevent the same, has violated any provision of this chapter or any regulation lawfully made by the Commission under §

6.2-1535

; or

Any fact or condition exists that clearly would have warranted the Commission to refuse originally to issue the license.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-290; 1956, c. 71; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-260; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1512.
Suspension of license.

If the Commission finds that probable cause for revocation of any license exists and that enforcement of the law requires immediate suspension of the license pending investigation, it may, upon three days’ written notice and a hearing, by the Commission or by the Commissioner, enter an order suspending the license for a period not exceeding 30 days.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-291; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-261; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1513.
Record and notice of revocation or suspension.

Whenever the Commission revokes or suspends a license issued pursuant to this chapter, it shall:

Enter an order to that effect, which order shall set forth its findings;

Compile a record containing (i) a summary of the evidence, (ii) the findings with respect thereto, (iii) the order, and (iv) the reasons supporting the revocation or suspension; and

Serve a copy of the order upon the licensee.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-292; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-262; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1514.
Surrender of license.

Any licensee may surrender any license by delivering it to the Commission with written notice of its surrender. The surrender shall not affect the licensee’s civil or criminal liability for acts previously committed.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-293; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-263; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1515.
Effect of license revocation, suspension, or surrender.

The revocation, suspension, or surrender of any license shall not impair or affect the obligation of any preexisting lawful contract between the licensee and any borrower.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-294; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-264; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1516.
Reinstatement of license.

The Commission may reinstate any suspended license, or issue a new license to a person any license of whom has been revoked, if no fact or condition then exists that clearly would have warranted the Commission to refuse originally to issue a license under this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-295; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-265; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1517.
Place of business generally.

A licensee shall not use any name other than the legal name or fictitious name set forth on the license issued by the Commission. No licensee shall conduct the business of making loans provided for by this chapter within any place of business other than is designated in the license issued by the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-296, 6-298; 1966, c. 584, §§ 6.1-266, 6.1-268; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and rewrote the section.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Making of loans not permitted at place other than designated in license. —

Defendant’s actions in making a loan without utilizing a licensed business location in Virginia violated the Consumer Finance Act rendered the loan agreement void as the loan was initiated by an unlicensed location of defendant in Georgia sending a check offering a loan directly to plaintiff at her home address in Virginia; and defendant’s initial unsolicited mailing of an offer for a loan with an interest rate in excess of 30% that included instructions on how to complete the loan (without the involvement of a licensed business location in Virginia) constituted the business of making a loan as contemplated by the Act, but any involvement by a properly licensed location in Virginia was for servicing the loan — not making the loan. Lendmark Fin. Servs. v. St. Clair, 102 Va. Cir. 502, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 1788 (Page County Dec. 4, 2018).

§ 6.2-1518.
Notice of conduct of other business in same place of business; fee.

A licensee shall not conduct the business of making loans under this chapter within any office, suite, room, or other place of business in which any other business is solicited or engaged in, or in association or conjunction with any other business, unless the licensee has first given 30 days’ written notice to the Commission. Every notice shall be accompanied by a fee of $300.

Upon receipt of such notice and fee, the Commission may require the licensee to provide information relating to the other business, including how and by whom it will be conducted. The Commission shall have the authority to investigate the conduct of such other businesses in the licensee’s place of business.

The provisions of this section shall not affect (i) any regulations adopted by the Commission prior to July 1, 2000, governing the conduct of other businesses in the place of business designated in a license or (ii) the authority of the Commission to adopt such regulations as the Commission deems necessary.

If the Commission finds that the other business (i) is of such a nature or is being conducted in such a manner as to conceal or facilitate a violation or evasion of the provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to it; (ii) is contrary to the public interest; or (iii) is otherwise being conducted in an unlawful manner, the Commission may, after notice to the licensee and an opportunity for a hearing, prohibit or limit the conduct of such other business in the place of business designated in the license.

Any authority granted under this section shall remain in full force and effect until surrendered, or until revoked or suspended by the Commission as provided in this chapter or by lawful order of the Commission.

A licensee that conducts the business of making loans pursuant to this chapter solely over the Internet shall not offer, sell, or make available any other products or services to Virginia residents, except as permitted by Commission regulation or upon approval of a written application with the Commission, payment of a fee of $300, and provision of such information as the Commission may deem pertinent.

This section shall not apply to any other business that is transacted solely with persons residing outside the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-297; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-267; 1981, c. 452, § 6.1-267.1; 1982, c. 609; 2000, c. 192; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and added subsections F and G.

§ 6.2-1519.
Changing place of business.

A licensee may change its place of business to a different location in the Commonwealth if the new location is:

Within the original locality; or

From the original locality to a location in a contiguous locality.

A licensee shall notify the Commission of a change in the place of business within 10 days of such relocation. Upon receipt of the notification, the Commission shall issue and deliver to the licensee an amended license covering the new location if it finds that the change in the place of business meets one of the criteria listed in subsection A. Each notice of change of location under this section shall be accompanied by a fee of $250.

History.

1982, c. 78, § 6.1-269.1; 1988, c. 147; 2000, c. 192; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1520.
Rate of interest; late charges; processing fees.

A licensee may make installment loans of between $300 and $35,000, which loans shall have a term of no fewer than six months and no more than 120 months and shall be repayable in at least six substantially equal consecutive payments. A licensee may charge and collect interest on a loan made under this chapter at a single annual rate not to exceed 36 percent. Interest shall not be charged on an add-on basis and shall not be compounded but shall be computed and paid only as a percentage of the unpaid principal balance. Interest shall be computed on the basis of the number of days elapsed; however, if part or all of the consideration for a loan contract is the unpaid principal balance of a prior loan, then the principal amount payable under the loan contract may include any unpaid interest on the prior loan that has accrued within 90 days before the making of the new loan contract. For the purpose of computing interest, a day may equal 1/360th or 1/365th of a year.

A licensee may charge a late payment fee of $20 for any payment or portion of a payment not received and applied within 10 days of the contractual due date. For purposes of this section, a late payment fee for any individual scheduled contractual payment due may be assessed only once. The late payment fee shall be specified in the contract between the lender and the borrower.

A licensee may charge a loan processing fee not to exceed the greater of $50 or six percent of the principal amount of the loan, provided that the loan processing fee shall in no event exceed $150. The loan processing fee shall be stated in the loan contract. The loan processing fee shall not be deemed to constitute interest charged on the principal amount of the loan for purposes of determining whether the interest charged exceeds the 36 percent annual contract interest rate limitation imposed by subsection A. Upon payment of the full amount of principal due plus accrued interest and any other applicable fees within the first 30 days, whether through outside funds or a refinancing under a new loan advance, the borrower shall be entitled to a full rebate of the loan processing fee less an amount not to exceed $50 or the actual loan processing fee, whichever is less. If a loan is refinanced or renewed, a licensee may assess an additional loan processing fee on the loan no more than once during any 12-month period.

A licensee may collect from the borrower the amount of any actual fees necessary to file, record, or release its security interest with any public official or agency of a locality or the Commonwealth as may be required by law.

History.

1995, c. 2, § 6.1-272.1; 2001, c. 308; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and rewrote the section.

§ 6.2-1521.
Post-judgment charges.

If judgment is obtained against any party on any loan made under the provisions of this chapter, neither the judgment nor the loan shall carry, from the date of the judgment, any charges against any party to the loan other than court costs, attorney fees, and interest on the amount of the judgment at the rate fixed by §

6.2-302

.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-603; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-273; 1975, c. 270; 1987, c. 196; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1522.
Other limitations on interest.

Any loan made under the provisions of this chapter that is properly scheduled in a bankruptcy proceeding shall bear interest against any party to the loan from 90 days after the date of adjudication, whether there is an ultimate discharge or an extension, if any interest is allowable at all, at six percent per year. This limitation shall not apply (i) to a comaker not currently in bankruptcy when the bankrupt is not entitled to a discharge, or (ii) if the particular obligation is not dischargeable under the provisions of Title 11 of the United States Code.

After 90 days from the date of the death of the borrower, no other charges than interest at six percent per year shall be computed or collected from any party to the loan upon the unpaid principal balance of the loan.

For the period beginning six months after the date of maturity, as originally scheduled or as deferred in the event of deferment, of any loan contract under the provisions of this chapter, no further charges than interest at six percent per year shall be computed or collected from any party to the loan upon the unpaid balance of the loan.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-304, 6-305, 6-306; 1966, c. 584, §§ 6.1-274, 6.1-275, 6.1-276; 1968, c. 489; 1987, c. 410; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1523.
Additional charges prohibited; exceptions.

In addition to the interest, late payment fees, and loan processing fee permitted under §

6.2-1520

, no further or other amount whatsoever for any examination service, brokerage, commission, fine, notarial fee, or other thing or otherwise shall be directly or indirectly charged, contracted for, collected, or received, except:

Insurance premiums actually paid out by the licensee to any insurance company or agent duly authorized to do business in the Commonwealth or another state for insurance for the protection and benefit of the borrower written in connection with any loan;

The actual cost of recordation fees or, on loans over $100, the amount of the lawful premiums, no greater than such fees, actually paid for insurance against the risk of not recording any instrument securing the loan; and

A handling fee not to exceed $25 for each check returned to the licensee because the drawer had no account or insufficient funds in the payor bank.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-308; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-278; 1978, c. 625; 1981, cc. 37, 38; 1984, c. 296; 1986, c. 502; 1990, c. 751; 1995, c. 2; 2001, c. 308; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and in the introductory language, substituted “late payment fees, and loan” for “late charges and”; in subdivision 1, inserted “or another state” and in subdivision 3, substituted “$25” for “$15.”